District of Columbia statutes.
46-308.02

Repealed

Conditions of rendition.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 802, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(h), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 802 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
D.C. Law 16-137, in subsec. (b), deleted “the Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act, or the Revised Uniform Reciprocal Enforcement of Support Act,” following “this chapter”.
1981 Ed., § 30-348.2.